West Virginia, session 2026, HB5097.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. HOSPITALS AND SIMILAR INSTITUTIONS. §16B-3-22. Communication requirements for hearing and speech impaired. (a) The Legislature finds that every hospital, ambulatory health care facility, ambulatory surgical facility, or extended care facility operating under the provisions of this article must ensure effective communication with deaf and hard of hearing patients. This requirement is consistent with the provisions of the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA).(b) Facilities shall provide accessible communication services to patients who are deaf or hard of hearing that includes, but is not limited to: (1) Providing American Sign Language (ASL) interpreters for consultations and appointments;(2) Providing assistive listening devices and communication technology;(3) Ensuring that all medical forms and documents are available in accessible formats, including captions or large print; and (4) Installing visual alarm systems in hospitals or healthcare facilities.(c) In the event that an ASL interpreter is not available to assist a patient or patient's caregiver or family member, the facility shall provide access to assistive hearing devices and technologies, such as: (1) Hearing loops, captioning services, visual alert systems, and video relay services; or(2) Appropriate technologies for personal communication in public spaces.(d) An ASL interpreter retained to work in the facilities covered by this section shall be approved by the West Virginia Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.  (e) Noncompliance with this section shall be reportable to licensing authorities.(f) This section becomes effective upon passage.